cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví > Zdravotnické vybavení: Automatické externí defibrilátory; Zdravotnické popruhy; Reflexní kladívka; Zdravotnická nosítka a pojízdná lůžka; Otoskopy a oftalmoskopy; Zařízení pro zvedání pacientů; Stetoskopy; Monitory životních funkcí – příslušenství; Monitory životních funkcí
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos > Equipo médico: Desfibriladores externos automatizados; Cinturones de traslado; Martillo de reflejos y diapasones; Camillas médicas con y sin ruedas; Otoscopios y oftalmoscopios; Grúas ortopédicas; Estetoscopios; Accesorios para monitores de constantes vitales; Monitores de constantes vitales
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch > Medische apparatuur: Automatische externe defibrillatoren; Tilbanden; Reflexhamers; Brancards; Otoscopen en oftalmoscopen; Patiëntenliften; Stethoscopen; Accessoires voor vitale tekenen-monitor; Medische bewakingsmonitor
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico > Equipamento médico: Desfibriladores externos automáticos; Cintos de marcha; Diapasões e martelos de reflexologia médicos; Esticadores e macas médicos; Otoscópios e oftalmoscópios; Elevadores de pacientes; Estetoscópios; Acessório de monitorização de sinais vitais; Monitorização de sinais vitais
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински > Медицинско оборудване: Автоматизирани външни дефибрилатори; Колани за трудноподвижни пациенти; Неврологични чукчета и камертони; Болнични носилки и колички; Отоскопи и офталмоскопи; Асансьори за пациенти; Стетоскопи; Аксесоари показващи жизнените показатели; Монитори на жизнени показатели
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical > Echipamente medicale: Defibrilatoare externe automate; Centuri pentru mers; Ciocănele medicale pentru reflexe și diapazoane; Tărgi și paturi mobile medicale; Otoscoape și oftalmoscoape; Dispozitive de ridicare pentru pacienți; Stetoscoape; Accesorii pentru monitor semne vitale; Monitoare semne vitale
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료 > 의료 장비: 자동 외부 제세동기; 보행용 벨트; 의료용 반사망치/소리굽쇠; 들것/바퀴 달린 들것; 검이경/검안경; 환자 리프트; 청진기; 바이털 사인 부대용품; 바이털 사인 모니터
da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk > Medicinsk udstyr: Automatiske eksterne defibrillatorer; Gangbælter; Reflekshammere; Bårer; Otoskoper og oftalmoskoper; Patientlifte; Stetoskoper; Tilbehør til skærme til patientovervågning; Skærme til patientovervågning
nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk > Medisinsk utstyr: Automatiske eksterne hjertestartere; Gangbelter; Medisinske reflekshammere og stemmegafler; Medisinske bårer; Otoskoper og optalmoskoper; Pasientløftere; Stetoskoper; Overvåkningsutstyr for vitale signaler; Overvåkning av vitale signaler
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế > Thiết bị y tế: Máy khử rung tim bên ngoài tự động; Đai hỗ trợ di chuyển; Búa thử phản xạ và âm thoa; Băng ca y tế; Phễu soi tai và kính khám mắt; Thiết bị nâng bệnh nhân; Ống nghe; Phụ kiện thiết bị theo dõi các chỉ số sức khỏe; Thiết bị theo dõi các chỉ số sức khỏe
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina > Medicinos įranga: Automatiniai išoriniai defibriliatoriai; Eisenos palaikymo diržai; Medicininiai refleksiniai plaktukai ir kamertonai; Medicininiai neštuvai ir lovos ant ratukų; Otoskopai ir oftalmoskopai; Pacientų keltuvai; Stetoskopai; Gyvybinių funkcijų monitorių priedai; Gyvybinių funkcijų monitoriai
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal > Medikal Ekipmanlar: Otomatik Harici Defibrilatörler; Yürüyüş Kemerleri; Refleks Çekiçleri ve Ses Çatalları; Tıbbi Sedyeler; Otoskoplar ve Oftalmaskoplar; Hasta Kaldırıcılar; Stetoskoplar; Yaşamsal Belirti Monitörü Aksesuarları; Yaşamsal Belirti Monitörleri
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna > Sprzęt medyczny: Automatyczne defibrylatory zewnętrzne; Pasy transportowe; Młotki neurologiczne; Nosze ręczne i nosze na kółkach; Otoskopy i oftalmoskopy; Podnośniki pacjenta; Stetoskopy; Akcesoria do monitorów oznak życiowych; Monitory oznak życiowych
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์ > อุปกรณ์ทางการแพทย์: เครื่องกระตุกหัวใจไฟฟ้าชนิดอัตโนมัติ; เข็มขัดช่วยพยุง; ค้อนเคาะเข่าและส้อมเสียง; เปลและเตียงเคลื่อนย้ายผู้ป่วย; กล้องส่องตรวจหูและกล้องส่องตรวจตา; ที่ยกตัวคนไข้; หูฟังแพทย์; อุปกรณ์เครื่องตรวจสอบสัญญาณชีพ; เครื่องตรวจสอบสัญญาณชีพ
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина > Медицинское оборудование: Автоматические наружные дефибрилляторы; Пояса для перемещения пациентов; Неврологические молоточки и камертоны; Медицинские тележки и каталки; Отоскопы и офтальмоскопы; Подъемники для пациентов; Стетоскопы; Аксессуары для мониторов контроля жизненных функций; Мониторы контроля жизненных функций
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical > Équipement médical: Défibrillateurs externes automatisés; Ceintures de transfert; Marteaux à réflexes et diapasons; Brancards et civières; Otoscopes et ophtalmoscopes; Lève-personnes; Stéthoscopes; Accessoires pour moniteurs de signes vitaux; Moniteurs de signes vitaux
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo > Medicinska oprema: Avtomatizirani zunanji defibrilatorji; Pasovi za premeščanje; Medicinska refleksna kladiva in glasbene vilice; Medicinska nosila in nosilne postelje; Otoskopi in oftalmoskopi; Bolniška dvigala; Stetoskopi; Dodatki za monitorje vitalnih funkcij; Monitorji vitalnih funkcij
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina > Medicinska oprema: Automatski vanjski defibrilatori; Pojasevi za hod; Medicinski refleksni čekići i glazbene vilice; Medicinska nosila i kolica; Otoskopi i oftalmoskopi; Dizala za pacijente; Stetoskopi; Pribor za monitore vitalnih funkcija; Monitori vitalnih funkcija
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi > Orvosi berendezések: Automatizált külső defibrillátorok; Járástámogató övek; Orvosi reflexkalapácsok és hangvillák; Orvosi hordágyak; Otoszkópok és oftalmoszkópok; Betegfelvonók; Sztetoszkópok; Életjel-felügyelő kiegészítők; Életjel-felügyelők
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη > Ιατρικός εξοπλισμός: Αυτοματοποιημένοι εξωτερικοί απινιδωτές; Ζώνες βάδισης; Ιατρικά (νευρολογικά) σφυράκια αντανακλαστικών & ιατρικά διαπασών; Ιατρικά φορεία & καρότσια μεταφοράς; Ωτοσκόπια και οφθαλμοσκόπια; Ανυψωτήρες ασθενών; Στηθοσκόπια; Αξεσουάρ παρακολούθησης ζωτικών σημείων; Οθόνες ζωτικών σημείων
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich > Medizinische Geräte: Automatisierte externe Defibrillatoren; Medizinische Hebegürtel; Reflexhämmer; Tragen; Otoskope & Ophthalmoskope; Patientenlifter; Stethoskope; Zubehör für Vitaldatenmonitore; Vitaldatenmonitore
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗 > 医疗器械: 自动体外除颤器; 护理移位腰带/辅助转移带; 叩诊锤/音叉; 医疗担架/轮床; 耳镜与检眼镜; 患者升降机; 听诊器; 监护仪配件; 生命体征监测仪
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina > Apparecchiature mediche: Defibrillatori esterni automatici; Cinture per deambulazione; Diapason e martelletti per riflessi; Lettighe e barelle; Otoscopi e oftalmoscopi; Sollevatori per pazienti; Stetoscopi; Accessori per monitor di parametri vitali; Monitor per i segni vitali
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede > Lääketieteelliset laitteet: Automaattiset ulkoiset defibrillaattorit; Nostovyöt; Refleksivasarat ja ääniraudat; Paarit ja tuentavälineet; Otoskoopit ja oftalmoskoopit; Potilasnostimet; Stetoskoopit; Elintoimintojen valvontamonitorien lisätarvikkeet; Elintoimintojen valvontamonitorit
en: Business & Industrial > Medical > Medical Equipment: Automated External Defibrillators; Gait Belts; Medical Reflex Hammers & Tuning Forks; Medical Stretchers & Gurneys; Otoscopes & Ophthalmoscopes; Patient Lifts; Stethoscopes; Vital Signs Monitor Accessories; Vital Signs Monitors
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業 > 醫療設備: 自動體外心臟去顫器; 輔助移位帶; 醫療反射槌和醫療音叉; 擔架床; 耳鏡/檢眼鏡; 病患移位機; 聽診器; 生命徵象監測儀配件; 生命徵象監測器
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療 > 医療機器: AED; 介助ベルト; 打診器; 医療用担架・ストレッチャー; 耳鏡・検眼鏡; 介護用リフト; 聴診器; 生体情報モニタ関連用品; 生体情報モニタ
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina > Equipamento médico: Desfibriladores externos automáticos; Cinto para transferência de paciente; Martelos de reflexo; Macas e camas hospitalares; Otoscópios e oftalmoscópios; Elevador de pacientes; Estetoscópios; Acessórios para monitores de sinais vitais; Monitores de sinais vitais
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo > Zdravotnícke vybavenie: Automatizované externé defibrilátory; Pásy na presun pacienta; Zdravotnícke reflexné kladivká a ladičky; Zdravotnícke nosidlá; Otoskopy a oftalmoskopy; Zdviháky pacientov; Stetoskopy; Príslušenstvo k monitoru vitálnych funkcií; Monitory vitálnych funkcií
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård > Medicinsk utrustning: Automatiska externa defibrillatorer; Lyftbälten; Reflexhammare; Sjukbårar; Otoskop och oftalmoskop; Patienthissar; Stetoskop; Tillbehör till vitalparametermätare; Vitalparametermätare